Hawaii statutes.
§159-28 Bribery. Any person or
employee of any person, who shall give, pay, or offer, directly or indirectly,
to any inspector, or any other officer or employee of the State authorized to
perform any of the duties prescribed by this chapter or by the rules of the
board, any money or other thing of value, with intent to influence the
inspector, or other officer or employee of this State, in the discharge of any
duty shall be guilty of a class C felony; provided the minimum sentence shall
be a $5,000 fine and a three-year term of imprisonment. Any inspector, or
other officer or employee of this State authorized to perform any of the duties
prescribed by this chapter, who shall accept any money, gift, or other thing of
value from any person, or officers, agents, or employees thereof, given with
intent to influence the inspector's, officer's, or employee's official action,
or who shall receive or accept from any person engaged in intrastate commerce
subject to this chapter any gift, money, or other thing of value given with or
without intent to influence the inspector's, officer's, or employee's official
actions, shall be discharged from office and shall be guilty of a class C
felony, provided the minimum fine shall be $1,000. [L 1969, c 214, pt of §1;
gen ch 1985; am L 1990, c 139, §6; am L 1991, c 88, §1]

Cross References

Classification of offense and authorized punishment, see
§§701-107, 706-610(2), 640, 660.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next